language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Ardenn/116
Beskid/116
Biskupic/108
Bólašojc/105
Bóžemysl/1,120
Błot/111
Celimojc/105
Cerwj/1,126
Chus/1,124
Chójan/107
Chóžyšć/1,118
Dobrj/1,126
Dołg/106
Drježdźan/107
Drobkow/107
Dulojc/105
Fidźikup/1,117
Filipin/116
Gar/107
Garj/1,124
Gjard/1,93
Gort/107
Górn/1,125
HI-wir/1,117
HIV-wir/1,117
Harnišojc/105
Hermanec/107
Huglin/1,117
Hukl/1,124
Hórnikec/107
Jamnic/105
Jat/107
Jězykojc/105
Kamjenk/1,115
Karpat/116
Klěśišć/104
Kobł/1,124
Kortmyt/1,117
Kryngelic/105
Kózł/1,117
Kóšar/107
Kśimnic/105
LEAG-pjenjez/113
Lipin/1,117
Lipj/1,128
Lěsk/132
Lěšć/1,120
Lěźin/107
Malediw/116
Marišojc/105
Mał/1,93
Mogilin/1,117
Moglin/1,117
Mułkec/107
Mułkojc/105
Módr/1,93
Měńkul/1,114
Njetopyrcyc/105
Pjerkojc/113
Priz/105
Pyrenej/1,120
Pódlěs/1,117
Rakec/108
Rjašćan/107
Rolan/107
Rusk/1,133
Rusojc/105
Ruś/106
Slopišć/1,118
Smólin/116
Stańšojc/105
Słopišć/1,118
Tor/1,117
Trjebul/105
Voges/113
Wilišć/1,118
Wjelimic/105
Wochoz/107
Wutwaŕk/1,115
Zasp/116
anal/1,120
bluejeans/113
bluwant/116
bobl/1,120
bog/131
boksershorts/109
bradł/111
burisk/1,133
byrgel/1,120
bł/1,117
błudnje/103
cartawk/1,115
celišć/1,118
chamornje/103
chips/1,114
chromje/1,102
chłodnje/103
comics/1,114
cor/1,127
depozit/107
dewotcionalij/1,120
distich/1,112
dochod/116
dojź/98
dokowa/103
dolan/107
dwójak/131
dług/131
e-orgel/1,120
fekalij/1,120
fidl/1,120
fidlic/113
fidlišć/1,118
fisimatent/1,117
fizimatent/116
ganglij/1,120
glasejk/1,115
gluc/122
gownaśe/1,102
gołubjet/1,112
grabic/113
gód/107
gójack/131
głažańc/113
głupje/103
hemorid/116
indicij/1,114
insignij/1,120
jasł/1,112
jeans/113
jesć/1,118
jesćij/1,118
jutšnj/1,126
jětš/111
kaktej/1,114
kamjenk/1,115
karask/131
kaśet/1,112
kimber/116
kmótś/1,118
kniglic/113
kniglisk/119
konopj/1,114
košt/1,117
krotc/122
kupjelišć/1,118
kwiś/123
kwiśe/1,102
kwjerlowank/1,115
kwjerlowańc/113
kólij/1,120
kónopj/1,114
kózlet/1,112
kłaź/98
kśěk/131
kšam/116
leggins/113
libjet/1,112
lutk/131
luźišć/1,118
lěkot/116
lěz/99
marnje/103
medij/1,120
mjeś/98
muce/1,102
mócnje/103
mórzg/1,115
měrnje/103
měłk/131
młoźet/111
narowna/101
naseś/94
nimje/1,102
njaborjet/1,112
njas/99
njebaž/122
njebjes/104
njecarnje/1,102
njechłoźe/1,102
njedojź/98
njedokowa/103
njedłož/122
njegóruc/122
njegłodnje/1,102
njejěź/98
njeklepc/122
njekwas/122
njekwiś/100
njekłaź/100
njekšawje/1,102
njelažc/122
njelěz/99
njemjeś/100
njemócnje/1,102
njeměrnje/103
njenadsajźa/101
njenaseś/94
njenimc/122
njenjas/99
njenjemudrje/1,102
njepas/99
njepjac/100
njeproc/122
njeprochniwje/1,102
njepóglěda/101
njepśemarnje/101
njepśeseś/94
njepśijěź/98
njepśinjas/97
njepśiź/98
njepśěź/100
njepšuž/122
njerjac/98
njerozda/101
njesec/100
njeslěc/100
njeslěpje/1,102
njespěš/122
njesćel/96
njetuž/122
njetłuc/100
njetśěs/99
njetšuchle/1,102
njewjeź/100
njewlac/100
njewobraś/94
njewobrěc/122
njewobse/101
njewobśěžka/103
njewujź/98
njewupódpěra/101
njewuseś/94
njewótgni/101
njezapóra/101
njezeseś/94
njezmjata/101
njełuž/122
njeśac/100
nješylawje/1,102
nožyc/113
parisk/1,133
pariš/113
patok/1,115
personalij/1,120
pilet/1,112
pjerš/122
plěsnje/1,102
podkop/116
połnje/103
prask/131
proset/111
psychofarmak/1,112
pógód/107
pópśima/101
pórědk/131
póžnjej/1,120
płatank/1,115
pśedcor/1,127
pśeseś/94
pśesodła/101
pśezwitś/1,128
pśinjas/97
pśišćipnic/113
pśiź/98
pśěź/100
pšostnje/1,102
racionalij/1,112
regin/116
rjac/98
rozkšajank/1,115
roztka/101
ryjnje/103
rědk/131
sebjewrot/111
sec/100
skij/1,114
sl/1,121
slěc/100
snic/113
sobjet/1,112
spadank/1,115
spikes/113
srant/1,117
stark/131
staśiw/116
styr/1,129
surowje/103
sušeńk/1,115
swisl/1,120
sypadł/1,112
sćel/96
słabučk/131
słupnišć/1,118
tałuž/122
tkalcojc/105
tonisk/1,133
triptych/1,112
tut/1,95
tłuc/100
tśěs/99
tšuchle/103
utensilij/1,120
warij/1,118
widlic/113
windows-wir/1,117
witś/1,128
wjelžnje/1,102
wjeź/100
wlac/100
wobjěź/130
wobraś/94
wobrězowank/1,115
wokósće/101
wrot/111
wrotk/111
wuběranic/113
wudwjern/111
wujź/98
wulapk/1,115
wulk/131
wuseś/94
wuspiwa/101
wust/104
wusyn/111
wutłocańk/1,115
wuśet/1,112
wódnje/103
wójack/131
wótstupa/101
wótškrabank/1,115
wěcejkost/116
wšyknyck/1,133
zamóst/1,117
zawumjatowa/101
zeseś/94
zgibk/131
zmywk/1,115
zwustaja/101
zwěrjet/1,112
zymnje/103
śac/100
śeśenjet/1,112
šerk/1,133
šesćiměst/111
šoradk/1,115
Źowkow/107
źaseśorak/131
źibaśe/103
źiwnučk/131
źurj/1,112
źuŕk/111
źěs/122
źěsnick/1,112
Želnojc/105
Žlobj/1,126
Žyźin/1,117
žnj/1,110
žytk/1,133
